Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201579-1205
Annual adjustment to boundaries; State Board of Education; duties.

On or before August 1 of each year, the State Board of Education shall adjust the boundaries of any educational service unit the boundaries of which do not align with the boundaries of the member school districts on August 1 of such year. Such boundary adjustments shall align the boundaries of the educational service unit with the boundaries of the member school districts as the boundaries of the member school districts existed on August 1 of such year. Such boundary adjustments shall be referred to the appropriate county and educational service unit officials, and such officials shall implement the adjustments and make the necessary changes in the educational service unit maps and tax records.

Laws 2007, LB603, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 25.
August 30, 2015